Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1006
Drainway, defined.

Drainway shall mean any depression two feet or more below the land which serves to give direction to a current of water less than nine months of the year, and which has a bed and well-defined banks.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 6.